Mississippi statutes. Title 9. Courts
Chapter 11. Justice Courts

§ 9-11-1.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1982, ch. 423, § 6, eff from and after January 1, 1984.

§9-11-1. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch 50, art. 14 (1, 2); 1857, ch. 58, arts. 1, 2; 1871, § 1297; 1880, § 2185; 1892, § 2392; 1906, § 2721; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2220; 1930, § 2069; 1942, § 1803; Laws, 1926, ch. 209; Laws, 1932, ch. 174; Laws, 1960, ch. 188; Laws, 1964, ch. 329, § 1; Laws, 1966, ch. 289, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 339, § 1; Laws, 1974, ch. 497, § 1; Laws, 1975, ch. 340; Laws, 1981, ch. 471, § 7; Laws, 1982, ch. 423, § 6]

§ 9-11-2.
Determination of number of justice court judges in each county.

From and after January 1, 1984, there shall be a competent number of justice court judges in each county of the state. The number of justice court judges for each county shall be determined as follows:

In counties with a population, according to the latest federal decennial census, of thirty-five thousand (35,000) and less, there shall be two (2) justice court judges unless the board of supervisors, by resolution duly spread upon its minutes, finds that one (1) justice court judge is a competent number to adequately handle the needs of the citizens of the county.

In counties with a population, according to the latest federal decennial census, of more than thirty-five thousand (35,000) and less than seventy thousand (70,000), there shall be three (3) justice court judges, unless the board of supervisors, by resolution duly spread upon its minutes, finds that two (2) is a competent number of justice court judges to adequately handle the needs of the citizens of the county.

In counties with a population, according to the latest federal decennial census, of seventy thousand (70,000) and less than one hundred fifty thousand (150,000), there shall be four (4) justice court judges, unless the board of supervisors, by resolution duly spread upon its minutes, finds that three (3) is a competent number of justice court judges to adequately handle the needs of the citizens of the county.

In counties with a population, according to the latest federal decennial census, of one hundred fifty thousand (150,000) and more, there shall be five (5) justice court judges, unless the board of supervisors, by resolution duly spread upon its minutes, finds that four (4) is a competent number of justice court judges to adequately handle the needs of the citizens of the county.

The board of supervisors shall establish single member election districts in the county for the election of each of the justice court judges authorized and required to be elected for the county under the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, and one (1) justice court judge shall be elected for each district by the electors thereof. In any county authorized and required under the provisions of subsection (1)(a) of this section to provide for the election of two (2) justice court judges for the county in which there are two (2) judicial districts, the smaller of such judicial districts, according to population based upon the latest federal decennial census, shall comprise or shall be wholly encompassed within one (1) of such election districts.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize or require more than five (5) justice court judges in any one (1) county from and after January 1, 1984, nor to authorize or require an increase in the number of justice court judges for any county during the term of office of any justice court judge.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize or require a county to decrease the number of justice court judge positions in the county as of June 30, 2014.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 497, § 2; Laws, 1975, ch. 423; Laws, 1981, ch. 471, § 8; Laws, 1983 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 7, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 515, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 9-11-3.
Certification of successful completion of courses of training and continuing education and minimum competency examination conducted and administered by Mississippi Judicial College; exemption from competency examination.

Except as otherwise provided herein, no justice court judge elected for a full term of office commencing on or after January 1, 2012, shall exercise the judicial functions of his office or be eligible to take the oath of office until he has filed in the office of the chancery clerk the following two (2) certifications: (a) a certificate of completion of a course of training and education conducted by the Mississippi Judicial College of the University of Mississippi Law Center; and (b) a certificate of successful completion of a minimum competency examination administered by the Mississippi Judicial College of the University of Mississippi Law Center within six (6) months of the beginning of the term for which such justice is elected. A justice court judge who has completed the course of training and education, passed the minimum competency examination, and has satisfied his annual continuing education course requirements, and who is then elected for a succeeding term of office subsequent to the initial term for which he completed the training course, shall not be required to repeat the basic training and education course upon reelection but shall be subject to the continuing education requirements.

In addition to meeting the requirements of subsection (1) of this section, after taking office, each justice court judge shall be required to file annually in the office of the chancery clerk a certificate of completion of a course of continuing education conducted by the Mississippi Judicial College.

The requirements for obtaining each of the certificates in subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall be as provided in Section 9-11-4.

Upon the failure of any justice court judge to file with the chancery clerk the certificates of completion as provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this section, such justice court judge shall, in addition to any other fine or punishment provided by law for such conduct, not be entitled to compensation for the period of time during which such certificates remain unfiled. If a justice court judge has not filed the required certifications within eight (8) months of the inception of the term, that justice court judge shall forfeit his office, his position shall be declared vacant, and the resulting vacancy shall be filled as provided by Section 23-15-839.

The competency examination requirements in Sections 9-11-3 and 9-11-4 shall not apply to any sitting justice court judges as of July 24, 2008.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1803.2; Laws, 1964, ch. 330; Laws, 1981, ch. 471, § 15; Laws, 1982, ch. 423, § 28; Laws, 1989, ch. 448, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 321, § 1; Laws, 2008, ch. 319, § 2; Laws, 2011, ch. 367, § 1, eff July 5, 2011 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).

§ 9-11-4.
Basic and continuing education courses for justice court judges; minimum competency examination; exemption from competency examination; remedial courses; costs and expenses.

The Mississippi Judicial College of the University of Mississippi Law Center shall prepare and conduct courses of training for basic and continuing education for justice court judges of this state. The basic course of training shall be known as the “Justice Court Judge Training Course” and shall consist of eighty (80) hours of training. The continuing education course shall be known as the “Continuing Education Course for Justice Court Judges,” and shall consist of twenty-four (24) hours of training. The content of the basic and continuing education courses and when and where such courses are to be conducted shall be determined by the Judicial College. The Judicial College shall issue certificates of completion to those justice court judges who complete such courses.

The Mississippi Judicial College of the University of Mississippi Law Center shall prepare and administer a minimum competency examination, as approved by the Mississippi Supreme Court, upon completion of the required basic course of training for justice court judges. If an elected justice court judge fails to complete the examination or fails the examination, there shall be a remedial twenty-four-hour course to be followed by a second opportunity for the justice court judge to achieve a passing score on the minimum competency examination.

All costs and expenses for preparing and conducting the basic and continuing education courses, the remedial basic course, and the minimum competency examination provided for in subsection (1) of this section shall be paid out of any funds which are made available to the Judicial College upon authorization and appropriation by the Legislature.

The competency examination requirements in Sections 9-11-3 and 9-11-4 shall not apply to any sitting justice court judge as of July 24, 2008.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 471, § 16; Laws, 1982, ch. 423, § 28; Laws, 2008, ch. 319, § 3; Laws, 2011, ch. 367, § 2, eff July 5, 2011 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).

§ 9-11-5.
Courtrooms; offices; insurance.

The justice court judges shall be provided courtrooms by the county and all trials shall be held therein. Such courtrooms shall be in the county courthouse, county office building or any other building within the county deemed appropriate by the board of supervisors.

The county shall provide office space and furnish each justice court office and provide necessary office supplies.

The board of supervisors of each county may secure insurance coverage to protect the office of the justice court clerk against losses due to theft or robbery.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1803.3; Laws, 1964, ch. 332; Laws, 1979, ch. 476, § 2; Laws, 1981, ch. 471, § 9; Laws, 1982, ch. 423, § 28; Laws, 1986, ch. 367; Laws, 2008, ch. 319, § 4; Laws, 2008, ch. 553, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2008.

§ 9-11-7.
Oath of office and bond.

Every person elected a justice court judge shall, before he enters on the duties of the office, take the oath of office prescribed by Section 155 of the Constitution, and give bond, with sufficient surety, to be payable, conditioned and approved as provided by law and in the same manner as other county officers, in a penalty not less than Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00); and any party interested may proceed on such bond in a summary way, by motion in any court having jurisdiction of the same, against the principal and surety, upon giving five (5) days’ previous notice.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 50, art 7 (1); 1857, ch. 58, art. 3; 1871, § 1298; 1880, § 2186; 1892, § 2393; 1906, § 2722; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2221; 1930, § 2070; 1942, § 1804; Laws, 1986, ch. 458, § 12; Reenacted, Laws, 1989, ch. 342, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 467, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 9-11-9.
Civil jurisdiction; pecuniary interest in outcome of action.

Justice court judges shall have jurisdiction of all actions for the recovery of debts or damages or personal property, where the principal of the debt, the amount of the demand, or the value of the property sought to be recovered shall not exceed Three Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($3,500.00).

The justice court judges shall have no pecuniary interest in the outcome of any action once suit has been filed.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 50, art 2 (9); 1857, ch 58, art. 7; 1871, § 1302; 1880, § 2190; 1892, § 2394; 1906, § 2723; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2222; 1930, § 2071; 1942, § 1805; Laws, 1964, ch. 333; Laws, 1977, ch. 308; Laws, 1981, ch. 471, § 4; Laws, 1985, ch. 478, § 1; Laws, 1986, ch. 365; Laws, 1995, ch. 573, § 1; Laws, 2008, ch. 319, § 5, eff July 24, 2008 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).

§ 9-11-10.
Civil jurisdiction; prepayment of costs as prerequisite; penalties.

No justice of the peace court shall have jurisdiction over any civil suit attempted to be filed therein unless and until all legally required court costs, as set out, but not restricted to, Sections 25-7-25 and 25-7-27, Mississippi Code of 1972, are deposited with the court. The justice of the peace shall not file, docket, issue process, or otherwise assume jurisdiction until such costs shall have been paid.

Any violation shall constitute a misdemeanor wherein the county court, or in the absence of a county court, the circuit court shall have jurisdiction. Upon conviction the justice of the peace shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) nor more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, 1974, ch. 329, eff from and after July 1, 1974.

§ 9-11-11.
Uniform case record; certified copies of papers furnished to parties; destruction of closed files.

It shall be the duty of the justice court to keep a uniform case record developed by the Attorney General on each case, civil and criminal, brought before it. Upon disposition, each record shall be signed by the justice court judge. It shall be the duty of a justice court, when required, to furnish to either party a certified copy of all proceedings, and of all papers and process relating thereto, in any action before it. Closed civil and criminal files may be destroyed after seven and one-half (71/2) years with written approval from the Director of the Department of Archives and History.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch 50, art. 2 (12); 1857, ch. 58, art. 14; 1871, § 1308; 1880, § 2193; 1892, § 2397; 1906, § 2726; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2225; 1930, § 2074; 1942, § 1808; Laws, 1981, ch. 471, § 17; Laws, 1982, ch. 423, § 28; Laws, 1985, ch. 440, § 2; Laws, 1998, ch. 439, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 9-11-13.
Entry to identify docket.

Each justice of the peace shall, at the beginning and in front of all his entries in his docket, make and subscribe substantially the following entry, to-wit:

“A docket of proceedings in matters civil and criminal before , a justice of the peace of the county of , in the State of Mississippi, in District No. of said county, for the election of justices of the peace. Witness my signature. Justice of the Peace.”

Click to view

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 2239; 1892, § 2398; 1906, § 2727; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2226; 1930, § 2075; 1942, § 1809.

§ 9-11-15.
Regular terms of court; nonresident defendant; trial at reasonable time; court of record; power to punish for contempt; designation of at least one-half day per month as traffic court day; expunction of misdemeanor convictions.

Justice court judges shall hold regular terms of their courts, at such times as they may appoint, not exceeding two (2) and not less than one (1) in every month, at the appropriate justice court courtroom established by the board of supervisors; and they may continue to hold their courts from day to day so long as business may require; and all process shall be returnable, and all trials shall take place at such regular terms, except where it is otherwise provided; but where the defendant is a nonresident or transient person, and it shall be shown by the oath of either party that a delay of the trial until the regular term will be of material injury to him, it shall be lawful for the judge to have the parties brought before him at any reasonable time and hear the evidence and give judgment or where the defendant is a nonresident or transient person and the judge and all parties agree, it shall be lawful for the judge to have the parties brought before him on the day a citation is made and hear the evidence and give judgment. Such court shall be a court of record, with all the power incident to a court of record, including power to fine in the amount of fine and length of imprisonment as is authorized for a municipal court in Section 21-23-7(11) for contempt of court.

In counties with a population of less than one hundred fifty thousand (150,000), each justice court shall designate at least one-half (1/2) day each month as a traffic court day, sufficient to handle the traffic violations docket of that court, and shall notify all appropriate law enforcement agencies of the date or dates. On the day or days so designated, the justice court shall give priority to all cases involving traffic violations.

In counties with a population of one hundred fifty thousand (150,000) or more, each justice court shall designate at least one (1) day each month as a traffic court day, sufficient to handle the traffic violations of that court, and shall notify all appropriate law enforcement agencies of the date or dates. On the day or days so designated, the justice court shall give priority to all cases involving traffic violations. The one (1) day may be one (1) whole day or it may be divided into half days as long as one-half (1/2) day is held in the morning and one-half (1/2) day is held in the afternoon, in the discretion of the court.

The justice court may, in its discretion, upon prior notice to the county prosecutor and upon a showing in open court of rehabilitation, good conduct for a period of two (2) years since the last conviction in any court and that the best interest of society would be served, order the record of conviction of a person of any or all misdemeanors in that court expunged, and upon so doing, such person thereafter legally stands as though he or she had never been convicted of the misdemeanor(s) and may lawfully so respond to any query of prior convictions. This order of expunction does not apply to the confidential records of law enforcement agencies and has no effect on the driving record of a person maintained under Title 63, Mississippi Code of 1972, or any other provision of said Title 63.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (3) of this section, a person who was convicted in justice court of a misdemeanor before reaching his twenty-third birthday, excluding conviction for a traffic violation, and who is a first offender, may utilize the provisions of Section 99-19-71, to expunge such misdemeanor conviction.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 50, art. 10 (5); 1857, ch. 58, art. 9; 1871, § 1309; 1880, § 2194; 1892, § 2399; 1906, § 2728; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2227; 1930, § 2076; 1942, § 1810; Laws, 1981, ch. 471, § 10; Laws, 1982, ch. 423, § 28; Laws, 1990, ch. 349, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 344, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 500, § 1; Laws, 2016, ch. 406, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 9-11-17.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1991, ch. 325 § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§9-11-17. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 50, art. 11 (6); 1857, ch. 58, art. 12; 1871, § 1312; 1880, § 2195; 1892, § 2400; 1906, § 2729; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2228; 1930, § 2077; 1942, § 1811; Laws, 1981, ch. 471, § 20; Laws, 1982, ch. 423, § 28]

§ 9-11-18.
Justice court clerk clearing account.

There is hereby created in the county depository of each county a clearing account to be designated as the “Justice Court Clerk Clearing Account,” in which shall be deposited (a) all such monies as the clerk of the justice court shall receive from any person complying with any writ of garnishment, attachment, execution or other like process authorized by law for the enforcement of a judgment; (b) all such monies as are received in criminal cases in the justice court pursuant to any order requiring payment as restitution to the victims of criminal offenses; (c) all cash bonds as shall be deposited with the court; (d) any portion of any fees required by law to be collected in civil cases which are to pay for the service of process or writs in another county as provided by Section 9-11-20; and (e) any other money as shall be deposited with the court, except fees paid for the services of a constable, which by its nature is not at the time of its deposit public monies, but which is to be held by the court in a trust or custodial capacity in a case or proceeding before the court. The clerk of the justice court shall account for all monies deposited in and disbursed from such account and shall be authorized and empowered to draw and issue checks on such account at such times, in such amounts and to such persons as shall be proper and in accordance with law; provided, however, such monies as are forfeited in criminal cases shall be paid by the clerk of the justice court to the clerk of the board of supervisors for deposit in the general fund of the county in the same manner as provided in Section 9-11-19 for fees, costs, fines and penalties charged and collected in the justice court.

Any monies deposited with the court in civil cases, which are fees paid for the services of a constable, shall be reported by the clerk of the court in the same manner as provided by Section 9-11-19 and shall be considered as being fees within the meaning of such section. It shall be the duty of the clerk of the board of supervisors to disburse such fees monthly, upon approval of the board of supervisors, to the constables entitled thereto.

The justice court clearing account may bear interest and the clerk of the justice court shall account for all interest earned on such account and pay such interest to the clerk of the board of supervisors for deposit in the general fund of the county in the same manner as provided in Section 9-11-19 for fees, costs, fines and penalties charged and collected in the justice court.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1984, ch. 502, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 414, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 9-11-19.
Collection and report of fines and penalties.

It shall be the duty of every clerk of the justice court to receive and account for all fees, costs, fines and penalties charged and collected in the justice court, and, monthly to report in writing under oath, to the clerk of the board of supervisors who shall upon receipt submit such report to the board of supervisors of all such fees, costs, fines and penalties received, including cash bonds and other monies which have been forfeited in criminal cases and at least semiannually any delinquent fines and penalties, giving the date, amount, and names of persons from whom such monies were received, and to pay so much thereof as shall have been received to the clerk of the board of supervisors for deposit into the general fund of the county. Any clerk of the justice court who shall fail to make such report or to pay the money so received shall, in addition to any other fine or punishment provided by law for such conduct, not be entitled to compensation for the period of time during which such report or money is outstanding.

The provisions of this section shall not, except as to cash bonds and other monies which have been forfeited in criminal cases, apply to monies required to be deposited in the justice court clerk clearing account as provided in Section 9-11-18, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 50, art. 2 (27); 1857, ch. 58, art. 33; 1871, § 1342; 1880, § 2230; 1892, § 2430; 1906, § 2759; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2258; 1930, § 2107; 1942, § 1841; Laws, 1932, ch. 195; Laws, 1981, ch. 471, § 21; Laws, 1982, ch. 423, § 14; Laws, 1984, ch. 502, § 3; Laws, 1993, ch. 406, § 1, eff from and after October 1, 1993.

§ 9-11-20.
Service of process or writ outside of issuing county; sharing fees.

In any civil case in the justice court in which any process or writ is to be served outside of the county where issued, the clerk of the justice court is hereby authorized and directed to forward, by United States mail, to the clerk of the justice court of the county where such writ or process is to be served, that portion of any fees required by law to be collected for the service of such process or writ along with the process or writ to be served. The clerk of the justice court of the county where the process or writ is to be served shall, upon receipt thereof, deliver such process or writ to a constable of the county for the service thereof and shall report and pay over such fees to the chancery clerk of the county at the time and in the manner provided in subsection (1) of Section 9-11-19 for the report and payment of fees, costs, fines and penalties charged and collected in the justice court.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1984, ch. 502, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1984).

§ 9-11-21.
Receipt itemizing costs, fees and other payments made to clerk of justice court.

The clerk of the justice court is required in all cases to give to any person paying him any fees, costs or other money a uniform receipt, the form of which is to be prepared by the attorney general. Such receipt shall contain the particulars of such fees, costs or other money, the amount of such fees, costs or other money and such other information as the attorney general shall deem necessary. The county shall have printed such receipts at county expense and distribute them to the clerk of the justice court of the county. Provided, however, that where the party filing the complaint is an entity of government, the clerk shall not be required to receive a prepayment of costs nor issue a receipt, but the clerk shall enter a notation on the docket wherein said complaint is recorded indicating that the party is exempt from payment of costs.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1841.5; Laws, 1964, ch. 334; Laws, 1984, ch. 502, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1984).

§ 9-11-23.
Remedy for money collected.

When any clerk of the justice court shall have collected in his official capacity any money, fines or penalties, and shall fail to pay or account for the same to the person or official entitled to receive the same, he shall be liable to be proceeded against on his official bond in a summary way by motion in any court having jurisdiction of the amount collected and withheld, of which motion five (5) days’ notice shall be served on the clerk of the justice court and the sureties on his bond, or such of them as may be found; and judgment for the amount illegally withheld by the clerk of the justice court and ten percent (10%) thereon, and all costs, shall be rendered against the clerk of the justice court and his sureties, or such of them as have been served with notice.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 50, art. 2 (26); 1857, ch. 58, art. 32; 1871, § 1339; 1880, § 2229; 1892, § 2431; 1906, § 2760; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2259; 1930, § 2108; 1942, § 1842; Laws, 1985, ch. 440, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 27, 1985).

§ 9-11-25.
Delivery of books, records and papers of justice court judge leaving office or dying to justice court clerk.

Every justice court judge whose term of office expires, or who resigns, removes from the county, or otherwise goes out of office, and the legal representative and next of kin of every justice court judge who dies, shall, within ten (10) days thereafter, deliver his case record, with all process and papers and books of statutes relating to his office, to the clerk of the justice court of the county.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 50, art. 10 (3); 1857, ch. 58, art. 15; 1871, § 1341; 1880, §§ 2232-2236; 1892, § 2432; 1906, § 2761; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2260; 1930, § 2109; 1942, § 1843; Laws, 1981, ch. 471, § 22; Laws, 1982, ch. 423, § 28; Laws, 1991, ch. 594, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 15, 1991).

§ 9-11-27.
Appointment of clerk; designation of powers; compliance with Section 9-1-46.

The board of supervisors of each county shall, at its own expense, appoint one (1) person to serve as clerk of the justice court system of the county, and may appoint such other employees for the justice court of the county as it deems necessary, including a person or persons to serve as deputy clerk or deputy clerks. The board of supervisors of each county with two (2) judicial districts may, at its own expense, appoint two (2) persons to serve as clerks of the justice court system of the county, one (1) for each judicial district, and may appoint such other employees for the justice court system of the county as it deems necessary including persons to serve as deputy clerks. The clerk and deputy clerks shall be empowered to file and record actions and pleadings, to receive and receipt for monies, to acknowledge affidavits, to issue warrants in criminal cases upon direction by a justice court judge in the county, to approve the sufficiency of bonds in civil and criminal cases, to certify and issue copies of all records, documents and pleadings filed in the justice court and to issue all process necessary for the operation of the justice court. The clerk or deputy clerks may refuse to accept a personal check in payment of any fine or cost or to satisfy any other payment required to be made to the justice court. All orders from the justice court judge to the clerk of the justice court shall be written. All cases, civil and criminal, shall be assigned by the clerk to the justice court judges of the county in the manner provided in Section 11-9-105 and Section 99-33-2. A deputy clerk who works in an office separate from the clerk and who is the head deputy clerk of the separate office may be designated to be trained as a clerk as provided in Section 9-11-29.

By August 1, 2015, and each year thereafter, the Administrative Office of Courts shall report the names of all justice court clerks who have failed to comply with the reporting requirements of Section 9-1-46 to the boards of supervisors that selected them. Each clerk shall be given three (3) months from the date on which the board was given notice to come into compliance with the requirements of Section 9-1-46. The Administrative Office of Courts shall notify the board of supervisors of any justice court clerk who fails to come into compliance after the three-month notice required in this subsection. Any noncompliant clerks shall be terminated for failure to comply with Section 9-1-46 reporting requirement.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 409; Laws, 1981, ch. 471, § 11; Laws, 1982, ch. 423, § 7; Laws, 1985, ch. 440, § 4; Laws, 1990, ch. 380, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 480, § 2; Laws, 1991, ch. 551, § 3; Laws, 1994, ch. 341, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 462, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 457, § 70, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 9-11-29.
Clerk’s certificate of completion of Justice Court Clerks Training Course; bond entered by clerk.

Within ninety (90) days after appointment, every person appointed as clerk of the justice court under the provisions of Section 9-11-27, or a deputy clerk designated to receive training under Section 9-11-27, shall file annually in the office of the circuit clerk a certificate of completion of a course of training and education conducted by the Mississippi Judicial College of the University of Mississippi Law Center. The training course shall be known as the “Justice Court Clerks Training Course” and shall consist of at least twelve (12) hours of instruction. The contents of the courses and when and where the courses are to be conducted shall be determined by the judicial college. The judicial college shall issue a certificate of completion to the clerks and deputy clerks who complete a course.

Every person appointed as clerk and deputy clerk of the justice court shall, before entering into the duties of the position, give bond, with sufficient surety, to be payable, conditioned and approved as provided by law and in the same manner as other county officers, in a penalty equal to Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00); and any party interested may proceed on such bond in a summary way, by motion in any court having jurisdiction of the same, against the principal and sureties, upon giving five (5) days’ previous notice. The cost of the bond shall be paid by the county.

Upon the failure of any person appointed as clerk of the justice court to file the certificates of completion as provided in subsection (1) of this section, that person shall not be allowed to carry out any of the duties of the office of clerk of the justice court, and shall not be entitled to compensation for the period of time during which the required certificates remain unfiled.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 471, § 12; Laws, 1982, ch. 423, § 8; Laws, 1986, ch. 352; Laws, 1986, ch. 458, § 13; reenacted, Laws, 1989, ch. 341, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 462, § 2; Laws, 2013, ch. 550, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2013.

§ 9-11-31.
Board of supervisors to appoint justice court or municipal court judge to serve for justice court judge who is unable to serve for thirty consecutive days.

When any justice court judge is unable, by reason of being under any suspension by the Commission on Judicial Performance or the Mississippi Supreme Court, or by reason of sickness or other disability, to attend and hold court at the time and place required by law to do so for a period of time in excess of thirty (30) consecutive days, and due to such inability to attend and hold court there is no judge to hold court in such county, the board of supervisors of the county in which such judge serves shall appoint another justice court judge of the county or an adjoining county or a municipal court judge to attend and hold said court and perform all the duties of such judge during such suspension or disability.

Any presently sitting justice court judge appointed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall receive no additional compensation for his or her service. Any other person so appointed shall, for the period of his service, receive compensation from the county for each day’s service a sum equal to 1/260ths of the current salary in effect for justice court judges.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 426, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 9-11-33.
Correction of errors or mistakes in proceedings or records; setting aside proceedings or judgments for good cause.

A justice court judge may correct any errors or mistakes in any proceedings that are conducted before such judge or in the records of proceedings conducted before such judge. A justice court judge may set aside any proceeding or judgment in a case conducted before such judge upon a written order as may be just and proper after a proceeding in which the judge determines that good cause has been shown to support such order.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 9-11-35.
Justice Court Collections Payment Program; purpose; funding of program.

The Department of Revenue shall administer the Justice Court Collections Payment Program. The purpose of the program shall be to provide support for salaries of justice court personnel, for the purchase, operation and maintenance of software and equipment, for facility planning and improvement, and for other expenses incurred for the purpose of collecting fines and assessments within the justice court system. Monies appropriated by the Legislature to the Department of Revenue for the purposes of funding the Justice Court Collections Payment Program shall be expended by the department to each participating county based upon that county’s deposits in the Treasury of the monies received under the provisions of Section 99-19-73.

The Department of Revenue shall promulgate rules and procedures relating to the disbursement of monies to participating counties. The department shall promulgate rules and procedures to ensure that the justice court system of a participating county practices proper and effective collection procedures for the collection of fines and other assessments. The county may use monies received from the program to defray the costs associated with collection actions under Section 19-3-41(4) for collection of delinquent fines and other assessments. The county shall participate in collection actions under Section 19-3-41(2) for collection of delinquent fines and other assessments in order to qualify.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 512, § 1; Laws, 2017, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 7, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved June 23, 2017).